New Mexico, session 2026, SB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 7-9F-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2000 (2nd S.S.), Chapter 22, Section 3, as amended by Laws 2019, Chapter 270, Section 38 and by Laws 2019, Chapter 274, Section 12) is amended to read: "7-9F-3. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act: A. "affiliate" means a person who directly or indirectly owns or controls, is owned or controlled by or is under common ownership or control with another person through ownership of voting securities or other ownership interests representing a majority of the total voting power of the entity; B. "annual payroll expense" means the wages paid or payable to employees in the state by the taxpayer in the taxable year for which the taxpayer applies for an additional credit pursuant to the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act; C. "base payroll expense" means the wages paid or payable by the taxpayer in the taxable year prior to the taxable year for which the taxpayer applies for an additional credit pursuant to the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act, adjusted for any increase from the preceding taxable year in the consumer price index for the United States for all items as published by the United States department of labor in the taxable year for which the additional credit is claimed. In a taxable year during which a taxpayer has been part of a business merger or acquisition or other change in business organization, the taxpayer's base payroll expense shall include the payroll expense of all entities included in the reorganization for all positions that are included in the business entity resulting from the reorganization; D. "department" means the taxation and revenue department, the secretary of taxation and revenue or any employee of the department exercising authority lawfully delegated to that employee by the secretary; E. "facility" means a factory, mill, plant, refinery, warehouse, dairy, feedlot, building or complex of buildings located within the state, including the land on which it is located and all machinery, equipment and other real and tangible personal property located at or within it and used in connection with its operation; F. "local option gross receipts tax" means a tax authorized to be imposed by a county or municipality upon a taxpayer's gross receipts, as that term is defined in the Gross Receipts and Compensating Tax Act, and required to be collected by the department at the same time and in the same manner as the gross receipts tax; G. "qualified expenditure" means an expenditure or an allocated portion of an expenditure by a taxpayer in connection with qualified research at a qualified facility, including expenditures for depletable land and rent paid or incurred for land, improvements, the allowable amount paid or incurred to operate or maintain a facility, buildings, equipment, computer software, computer software upgrades, consultants and contractors performing work in New Mexico, payroll, technical books and manuals and test materials, but not including any expenditure [on property that is owned by a municipality or county in connection with an industrial revenue bond project] for property for which the taxpayer has received any credit pursuant to the Investment Credit Act, property that was owned by the taxpayer or an affiliate before July 3, 2000 or research and development expenditures reimbursed by a person who is not an affiliate of the taxpayer. If a "qualified expenditure" is an allocation of an expenditure, the cost accounting methodology used for the allocation of the expenditure shall be the same cost accounting methodology used by the taxpayer in its other business activities; H. "qualified facility" means a facility in New Mexico at which qualified research is conducted. [other than] "Qualified facility" does not mean a facility operated by a taxpayer for the United States or any agency, department or instrumentality thereof, a facility in New Mexico designated as a national laboratory by an act of congress or a research facility in New Mexico that is owned by the state; I. "qualified research" means research: (1) that is undertaken for the purpose of discovering information: (a) that is technological in nature; and (b) the application of which is intended to be useful in the development of a new or improved business component of the taxpayer; and (2) substantially all of the activities of which constitute elements of a process of experimentation related to a new or improved function, performance, reliability or quality, but not related to style, taste or cosmetic or seasonal design factors; J. "qualified research and development small business" means a taxpayer that: (1) employed no more than fifty employees as determined by the number of employees for which the taxpayer was liable for unemployment insurance coverage in the taxable year for which an additional credit is claimed; (2) had total qualified expenditures of no more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the taxable year for which an additional credit is claimed; and (3) did not have more than fifty percent of its voting securities or other equity interest with the right to designate or elect the board of directors or other governing body of the business owned directly or indirectly by another business; K. "rural area" means any area of the state other than the state fairgrounds, an incorporated municipality with a population of thirty thousand or more according to the most recent federal decennial census and any area within three miles of the external boundaries of an incorporated municipality with a population of thirty thousand or more according to the most recent federal decennial census; L. "taxpayer" means any of the following persons, other than a federal, state or other governmental unit or subdivision or an agency, department, institution or instrumentality thereof: (1) a person liable for payment of any tax; (2) a person responsible for withholding and payment or collection and payment of any tax; (3) a person to whom an assessment has been made if the assessment remains unabated or the assessed amount has not been paid; or (4) for purposes of the additional credit against the taxpayer's income tax pursuant to the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act and to the extent of their respective interest in that entity, the shareholders, members, partners or other owners of: (a) a small business corporation that has elected to be treated as an S corporation for federal income tax purposes; or (b) an entity treated as a partnership or disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes; and M. "wages" means remuneration for services performed by an employee in New Mexico for an employer." SECTION 2. Section 7-9F-9.1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015 (1st S.S.), Chapter 2, Section 17) is amended to read: "7-9F-9.1. CLAIMING THE ADDITIONAL CREDIT.-- A. A taxpayer may apply for approval of an additional credit pursuant to the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act within one year following the end of the taxable year in which the qualified expenditure was made. B. A taxpayer that has applied for and been granted approval for an additional credit by the department pursuant to the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act may claim the amount of the approved additional credit against the taxpayer's income tax or corporate income tax liability. Except as provided in Subsection C of this section, no taxpayer may claim an amount of approved additional credit for a taxable year in which the additional credit is being claimed that exceeds the amount of the taxpayer's income tax or corporate income tax due for that taxable year. C. If a taxpayer is a qualified research and development small business and the amount of approved additional credit for the taxable year in which the additional credit is being claimed exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability or corporate income tax liability, the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer pursuant to Paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection. If the taxpayer's total qualified expenditures for the taxable year for which the claim is made is: (1) less than three million dollars ($3,000,000), the excess additional credit shall be refunded to the taxpayer; (2) greater than or equal to three million dollars ($3,000,000) and less than four million dollars ($4,000,000), two-thirds of the excess additional credit shall be refunded to the taxpayer; and (3) greater than or equal to four million dollars ($4,000,000) and less than or equal to five million dollars ($5,000,000), one-third of the excess additional credit shall be refunded to the taxpayer. D. Any amount of approved additional credit not claimed against the taxpayer's income tax or corporate income tax due for a taxable year or refunded to the taxpayer may be claimed in subsequent reporting periods for a period of up to [three] ten years from the date of the original claim. E. Married individuals filing separate returns for a taxable year for which they could have filed a joint return may each claim only one-half of the additional credit that would have been claimed on a joint return." SECTION 3. A new section of the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act, Section 7-9F-9.2 NMSA 1978, is enacted to read: "7-9F-9.2. [NEW MATERIAL] TRANSFERABILITY OF CREDITS.--The tax credits provided pursuant to the Technology Jobs and Research and Development Tax Credit Act may be sold, exchanged or otherwise transferred to another taxpayer for the full value of the credit. The parties to such a transaction shall notify the department of the sale, exchange or transfer within ten days of the sale, exchange or transfer." SECTION 4. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. - 9 -